Massachusetts, session 194th, S2903.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
The registrar shall furnish, without charge, to owners of private passenger motor vehicles
who are the parent, child or spouse of a law enforcement officer, as defined in section 1 of
chapter 6E, who has been killed in the line of duty, upon presentation of satisfactory evidence to
the registrar, a distinctive registration plate that reads “Blue Star Family” for 1 private passenger
motor vehicle owned and principally used by such parent, child or spouse or a distinctive “Blue
Star Family” emblem to be affixed to a registration plate for a motorcycle privately owned and
principally used by such parent, child or spouse. The registrar may issue a distinctive “Blue Star
Family” registration of up to 6 characters for 1 private passenger motor vehicle owned and
principally used by such parent, child or spouse. A law enforcement officer shall be deemed to
have been killed in the line of duty for purposes of this paragraph if their families are eligible for
benefits under section 100A of chapter 32.
of 1